Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.552

[Art. 64] Approval by the convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court martial, the convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he or she finds correct in law and fact and as he or she in his or her discretion determines should be approved. Unless he or she indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

[ 2011 c 336 s 771; 1963 c 220 s 66.]